Vermont, session 2025-2026, H230.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
5 Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 4251 is amended to read:
6 § 4251. TAKING WILD ANIMALS AND FISH; LICENSE
7 (a) Except as provided in sections 4253 and 4254b of this title, a person
8 shall not take wild animals or fish without first having procured a license
9 therefor; provided, however, that a person under 15 years of age may take fish
10 in accordance with this part and regulations of the Board, without first having
11 procured a license therefor.
12 (b) The Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife may designate two days each
13 calendar year as “free fishing days” for which no license shall be required.
14 One day shall occur in the open water fishing season and one day shall occur
15 during the ice fishing season.
16 (c) The Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife may designate Labor Day
17 weekend each year as “free mentored fishing weekend,” during which one
18 unlicensed angler can fish with one licensed angler throughout this three-day
19 period.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 3 of 31
1 Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 4613 is amended to read:
2 § 4613. FISHING TOURNAMENTS
3 (a) No person or organization shall hold a fishing tournament on the waters
4 of the State without first obtaining a permit from the Department of Fish and
5 Wildlife. Tournaments held on the Connecticut River, excluding Moore and
6 Comerford Reservoirs, that do not utilize an access area in Vermont are not
7 required to obtain a permit from the Department of Fish and Wildlife.
8 (b) A fishing tournament means a contest in which anglers pay a fee to
9 enter and in which the entrants compete for a prize based on the quality or size
10 of the fish they catch. A contest may run multiple days, but the days must be
11 consecutive for that contest to be considered a single event. A tournament that
12 limits the entrants to people below 15 years of age or a tournament held as part
13 of a Special Olympics program shall be exempt from paying the fee required
14 under subsection (d) of this section.
15 (c) The Commissioner shall adopt rules that establish the procedure for
16 implementation of this section. The rules shall include a provision that an
17 angler may not enter a fish that was caught and confined to an enclosed area
18 prior to the beginning of the tournament.
19 (d) The Commissioner shall charge a fee of $50.00 based on the number
20 of participants for each permit issued under this section and shall deposit the
21 fee collected into the Fish and Wildlife Fund. Tournaments with up to 25

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 4 of 31
1 participants shall pay a fee of $10.00; tournaments with 26 to 50 participants
2 shall pay a fee of $30.00; and tournaments with more than 50 participants shall
3 pay a fee of $100.00.
4 Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 4518 is amended to read:
5 § 4518. BIG GAME VIOLATIONS; THREATENED AND ENDANGERED
6 SPECIES; SUSPENSION; VIOLATIONS
7 (a) Whoever violates a provision of this part or orders or rules of the Board
8 relating to taking, possessing, transporting, buying, or selling of big game;
9 relating to threatened or endangered species; or relating to the trade in covered
10 animal parts or products that constitutes a big game violation shall be fined not
11 more than $1,000.00 $2,000.00 nor less than $400.00 $500.00 or imprisoned
12 for not more than 60 days, or both. Upon a second and all subsequent
13 convictions or any conviction while under license suspension related to the
14 requirements of part 4 of this title, the violator shall be fined not more than
15 $4,000.00 $5,000.00 nor less than $2,000.00 or imprisoned for not more than
16 60 180 days, or both.
17 (b) A “big game violation” means:
18 (1) violations relating to taking, possessing, transporting, buying, or
19 selling of big game;
20 (2) violations of chapter 123 of this title and the rules related to
21 threatened and endangered species;

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 5 of 31
1 (3) violation of section 4280 of this title relating to criminal
2 suspensions;
3 (4) violations of chapter 124 of this title relating to the trade in covered
4 animal parts or products;
5 (5) interference with hunting, fishing, or trapping in violation of section
6 4708 of this title; or
7 (6) illegal commercial importation or possession of wild animals in
8 violation of section 4709 of this title.
9 Sec. 4. 10 V.S.A. § 4552 is amended to read:
10 § 4552. JURISDICTION; VENUE
11 The Vermont Criminal Division of the Superior Court shall have exclusive
12 jurisdiction over fish and wildlife violations with the exception of violations
13 related to section 4152 and chapters 123 and 124 of this title. Venue for
14 adjudicating fish and wildlife violations shall be the unit of the Criminal
15 Division of the Superior Court having jurisdiction over the geographical area
16 where the offense is stated to have occurred.
17 Sec. 5. 10 V.S.A. § 4572 is amended to read:
18 § 4572. DEFINITIONS
19 (a) As used in this subchapter, a minor fish and wildlife violation means:
20 (1) a violation of 10 V.S.A. § 4145 (violation of access and landing area
21 rules);

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 6 of 31
1 (2) a violation of 10 V.S.A. § 4251 (taking wild animals and fish
2 without a license);
3 (3) a violation of 10 V.S.A. § 4266 (failure to carry a license on person
4 or failure to exhibit license);
5 (4) a violation of 10 V.S.A. § 4267 (false statements in license
6 application; altering license; transferring license to another person; using
7 another person’s license; or guiding an unlicensed person);
8 (5) a violation of 10 V.S.A. § 4713 (tree or ground stands or blinds); or
9 (6) [Repealed.]
10 (7) a violation of a biological collection rule adopted by the Board
11 under part 4 of this title; or
12 (8) except for big game offenses and under revocation offenses, a
13 warden may determine that a fish and wildlife violation not listed in this
14 section should be charged as a minor violation based on factors such as:
15 (A) the offender has no prior history of violations;
16 (B) the offender was cooperative and forthcoming or reported the
17 violation;
18 (C) there are mitigating circumstances;
19 (D) the totality of circumstances would lead a reasonable person to
20 believe that the offense is minor in nature;
21 (E) there is no possibility of forfeiture; and

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 7 of 31
1 (F) there is no need for a criminal warrant to investigate the
2 violation.
3 (b) “Bureau” means the Judicial Bureau as created in 4 V.S.A. § 1102.
4 Sec. 6. 10 V.S.A. § 4085 is added to read:
5 § 4085. REPTILES AND AMPHIBIANS
6 The Commissioner may adopt rules related to the protection, conservation,
7 and taking of reptiles and amphibians. The rules may:
8 (1) prohibit the possession and importation of species that pose a threat
9 to species and ecosystems in Vermont and allow the Department to establish a
10 list of prohibited or restricted species;
11 (2) allow for waivers for possession of prohibited species legally
12 acquired as a pet prior to July 1, 2025;
13 (3) prohibit the taking and collection of specified reptiles and
14 amphibians;
15 (4) establish open seasons for common species;
16 (5) establish daily, season, and possession limits for common species;
17 (6) establish territorial limits for any rule under this subchapter;
18 (7) prescribe the manner and means of taking any species or variety,
19 including reporting and tagging of game;
20 (8) establish restrictions on taking based upon sex, maturity, or other
21 physical distinction of the species or variety pursued; and

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 8 of 31
1 (9) designate Wildlife Management Units for various species or
2 varieties.
3 Sec. 7. 10 V.S.A. § 4709 is amended to read:
4 § 4709. TRANSPORT, IMPORTATION, POSSESSION, AND STOCKING
5 OF WILD ANIMALS; POSSESSION OF WILD BOAR OR FERAL
6 SWINE
7 (a) A person shall not bring into, transport into, transport within, transport
8 through, or possess in the State any live wild bird or animal of any kind,
9 including reptiles, amphibians, or any manner of feral swine, without
10 authorization from the Commissioner or his or her the Commissioner’s
11 designee. The importation permit may be granted under such regulations
12 therefor as rules, requirements, or conditions that the Commissioner shall
13 prescribe and only after the Commissioner has made such investigation and
14 inspection of the birds or animals as she or he the Commissioner may deem
15 necessary. The Department may dispose of unlawfully possessed or imported
16 wildlife as it may judge best, and the State may collect treble damages from
17 the violator of this subsection for all expenses incurred.
18 (b) No person shall bring into the State from another country, state, or
19 province wildlife illegally taken, transported, or possessed contrary to the laws
20 governing the country, state, or province from which the wildlife originated.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 9 of 31
1 (c) No person shall place a Vermont-issued tag on wildlife taken outside
2 the State. No person shall report big game in Vermont when the wildlife is
3 taken outside the State.
4 (d) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the Commissioner or duly
5 authorized agents of the Department of Fish and Wildlife from bringing into
6 the State for the purpose of planting, introducing, or stocking or from planting,
7 introducing, or stocking in the State any wild bird or animal.
8 (e) A person shall not take, collect, possess, sell, import, or export any wild
9 bird or animal, or parts thereof, dead or alive, for commercial purposes unless
10 authorized by the rules of the Board, rules of the Commissioner, or a permit
11 from the Commissioner.
12 (f) A person shall not take, collect, or possess any reptile or amphibian, or
13 parts thereof, dead or alive, for personal use unless authorized by the rules of
14 the Commissioner or a permit from the Commissioner.
15 (g) Any person who violates this section may be subject to the penalties set
16 forth in section 4518 of this title and also may be required to pay additional
17 penalties based on reasonable mitigation and potential economic benefit
18 associated with commercial trade.
19 (h) The Commissioner may bring an action in the unit of the Criminal
20 Division of the Superior Court having jurisdiction over the geographical area
21 where the offense is stated to have occurred, or the Environmental Division of

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 10 of 31
1 the Superior Court, to compel reasonable mitigation and recover economic
2 benefits for commercial collection and trade violations under this subsection.
3 (i) Applicants shall pay a permit fee of $100.00.
4 (f)(j)(1) The Commissioner shall not issue a permit under this section for
5 the importation or possession of the following live species, a hybrid or genetic
6 variant of the following species, offspring of the following species, or
7 offspring or a hybrid of a genetically engineered variant of the following
8 species: feral swine, including wild boar, wild hog, wild swine, feral pig, feral
9 hog, old world swine, razorback, Eurasian wild boar, or Russian wild boar
10 (Sus scrofo Linnaeus). A feral swine is:
11 * * *
12 Sec. 8. 10 V.S.A. § 5403(a) is amended to read:
13 (a) Except as authorized under this chapter, a person shall not:
14 (1) take, possess, or transport wildlife or wild plants that are members
15 of a threatened or endangered species; or
16 (2) destroy or adversely impact critical habitat;
17 (3) sell or offer for sale in intrastate commerce a threatened or
18 endangered species;
19 (4) deliver, receive, carry, transport, or ship a threatened or endangered
20 species in intrastate commerce; or

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 11 of 31
1 (5) import a threatened or endangered species into or export a
2 threatened or endangered species from Vermont.
3 Sec. 9. 10 V.S.A. § 5408 is amended to read:
4 § 5408. AUTHORIZED TAKINGS; INCIDENTALTAKINGS;
5 DESTRUCTION OF CRITICALHABITAT
6 (a) Authorized taking. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, after
7 obtaining the advice of the Endangered Species Committee, the Secretary may
8 permit, under such terms and conditions as the Secretary may require as
9 necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, the taking of a threatened
10 or endangered species, the destruction of or adverse impact on critical habitat,
11 or any act otherwise prohibited by this chapter if done for any of the following
12 purposes:
13 (1) scientific purposes;
14 (2) to enhance the propagation or survival of a threatened or endangered
15 species;
16 (3) zoological exhibition;
17 (4) educational purposes;
18 (5) noncommercial cultural or ceremonial purposes; or
19 (6) special purposes consistent with the purposes of the federal
20 Endangered Species Act.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 12 of 31
1 (b) Incidental taking. After obtaining the advice of the Endangered
2 Species Committee, the Secretary may permit, under such terms and
3 conditions as necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, the incidental
4 taking of a threatened or endangered species or the destruction of or adverse
5 impact on critical habitat if:
6 (1) the taking is necessary to conduct an otherwise lawful activity;
7 (2) the taking is attendant or secondary to, and not the purpose of, the
8 lawful activity;
9 (3) the impact of the permitted incidental take is minimized; and
10 (4) the incidental taking will not impair the conservation or recovery of
11 any endangered species or threatened species.
12 * * *
13 (k) Public notice. Prior Except for threatened and endangered species
14 listed by the Secretary in accordance with subsection 5410(b) of this title, to
15 issuing a permit for an incidental taking and prior to the initial issuance or
16 amendment of a general permit under this section, the Secretary shall provide
17 for public notice of no not fewer than 30 days, opportunity for written
18 comment, and opportunity to request a public informational hearing. The
19 Except for threatened and endangered species listed by the Secretary in
20 accordance with subsection 5410(b) of this title, the Secretary shall post permit
21 applications, permit decisions, and the initial or amended general permits on

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 13 of 31
1 the website of the Agency of Natural Resources. The Except for threatened
2 and endangered species listed by the Secretary in accordance with subsection
3 5410(b) of this title, the Secretary also shall provide notice to interested
4 persons who request notice of permit applications, permit decisions, and
5 proposed general permits or proposed amendments to general permits.
6 (l) General permits.
7 (1) The Secretary may issue general permits for activities that will not
8 affect the continued survival or recovery of a threatened or endangered
9 species.
10 * * *
11 (6) Prior Except for threatened and endangered species listed by the
12 Secretary in accordance with subsection 5410(b) of this title, prior to issuing
13 an initial or amended general permit under this subsection, the Secretary shall:
14 (A) post a draft of the general permit on the Agency website;
15 (B) provide public notice of at least 30 days; and
16 (C) provide for written comments or a public hearing, or both.
17 (7) For applications for coverage under the terms of an issued general
18 permit, the applicant shall provide notice on a form provided by the Secretary.
19 The Except for threatened and endangered species listed by the Secretary in
20 accordance with subsection 5410(b) of this title, the Secretary shall post notice
21 of the application on the Agency website and shall provide an opportunity for

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 14 of 31
1 written comment, regarding whether the application complies with the terms
2 and conditions of the general permit, for ten 10 days following receipt of the
3 application.
4 * * *
5 Sec. 10. 10 V.S.A. § 5410 is amended to read:
6 § 5410. LOCATION CONFIDENTIAL
7 (a) The Secretary shall not disclose information regarding the specific
8 location of threatened or endangered species sites or habitats except that the
9 Secretary shall disclose information regarding the location of the threatened or
10 endangered species to:
11 (1) to the owner of land upon which the species is located;
12 (2) to a potential buyer of land upon which the species is located who
13 has a bona fide contract to buy the land and applies to the Secretary for
14 disclosure of threatened or endangered species information; or
15 (3) to qualified individuals or organizations, public agencies, and
16 nonprofit organizations for scientific research or for preservation and planning
17 purposes when the Secretary determines that the preservation of the species is
18 not further endangered by the disclosure; or
19 (4) during regulatory processes with the exception of threatened or
20 endangered species listed under subsection (b) of this section.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 15 of 31
1 (b) The Secretary shall maintain a subset list of threatened and endangered
2 species whose specific names shall not be included in regulatory planning.
3 The subset list shall include threatened or endangered species for which the
4 species names and locations shall not be disclosed because of the risk that the
5 species will be significantly harmed by unauthorized take, such as illegal
6 collection, commercial trade, human-caused mortality, or destruction of
7 habitat. The list shall be based on the rarity of the species, known collection,
8 and commercial trade activities in Vermont and other states or countries,
9 incidents of human-caused mortality or destruction of habitat, and other factors
10 that present a threat to the continued existence of the species.
11 (c) When the Secretary issues a permit under this chapter to take a
12 threatened or endangered species or destroy or adversely impact critical habitat
13 and when the Secretary designates critical habitat by rule under section 5402a
14 of this title, the Secretary shall disclose only the municipality and general
15 location where the threatened or endangered species or designated critical
16 habitat is located. When the Secretary designates critical habitat under section
17 5402a of this title, the Secretary shall notify the municipality in which the
18 critical habitat is located and shall disclose the general location of the
19 designated critical habitat.
20 Sec. 11. 10 V.S.A. § 4829 is amended to read:
21 § 4829. PERSON SUFFERING DAMAGE BY DEER OR BLACK BEAR

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 16 of 31
1 (a) A person engaged in the business of farming who suffers damage by
2 deer to the person’s crops, fruit trees, or crop-bearing plants on land not posted
3 against the hunting of deer, or a person engaged in the business of farming
4 who suffers damage by black bear to the person’s cattle, sheep, swine, poultry,
5 or bees or bee hives on land not posted against hunting or trapping of black
6 bear is entitled to reimbursement for the damage up to an amount not to
7 exceed $5,000.00 per year, and may apply to the Department of Fish and
8 Wildlife within 72 hours of the occurrence of the damage for reimbursement
9 for the damage. As used in this section, “post” means any signage that would
10 lead a reasonable person to believe that hunting is prohibited on the land.
11 (b) As used in this section, a person is “engaged in the business of
12 farming” if he or she earns at least one-half of the farmer’s annual gross
13 income from the business of farming, as that term is defined in the Internal
14 Revenue Code, 26 C.F.R. § 1.175-3. [Repealed.]
15 Sec. 12. EFFECTIVE DATE
16 This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 4251 is amended to read:
§ 4251. TAKING WILD ANIMALS AND FISH; LICENSE
(a) Except as provided in sections 4253 and 4254b of this title, a person
shall not take wild animals or fish without first having procured a license
therefor; provided, however, that a person under 15 years of age may take fish

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 17 of 31
in accordance with this part and regulations of the Board, without first having
procured a license therefor.
(b) The Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife may designate two days each
calendar year as “free fishing days” for which no license shall be required.
One day shall occur in the open water fishing season and one day shall occur
during the ice fishing season.
(c) The Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife may designate Labor Day
weekend each year as “free mentored fishing weekend,” during which one
unlicensed angler can fish with one licensed angler throughout this three-day
period.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 4613 is amended to read:
§ 4613. FISHING TOURNAMENTS
(a) No person or organization shall hold a fishing tournament on the
waters of the State without first obtaining a permit from the Department of
Fish and Wildlife. Tournaments held on the Connecticut River, excluding
Moore and Comerford Reservoirs, that do not utilize an access area in Vermont
are not required to obtain a permit from the Department of Fish and Wildlife.
(b) A fishing tournament means a contest in which anglers pay a fee to
enter and in which the entrants compete for a prize based on the quality or size
of the fish they catch. A contest may run multiple days, but the days must be
consecutive for that contest to be considered a single event. A tournament that

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 18 of 31
limits the entrants to people below 15 years of age or a tournament held as
part of a Special Olympics program shall be exempt from paying the fee
required under subsection (d) of this section.
(c) The Commissioner shall adopt rules that establish the procedure for
implementation of this section. The rules shall include a provision that an
angler may not enter a fish that was caught and confined to an enclosed area
prior to the beginning of the tournament.
(d) The Commissioner shall charge a fee of $50.00 based on the number of
participants for each permit issued under this section and shall deposit the fee
collected into the Fish and Wildlife Fund. Tournaments with up to 25
participants shall pay a fee of $10.00; tournaments with 26 to 50 participants
shall pay a fee of $30.00; and tournaments with more than 50 participants
shall pay a fee of $100.00.
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 4518 is amended to read:
§ 4518. BIG GAME VIOLATIONS; THREATENED AND ENDANGERED
SPECIES; SUSPENSION; VIOLATIONS
(a) Whoever violates a provision of this part or orders or rules of the Board
relating to taking, possessing, transporting, buying, or selling of big game;
relating to threatened or endangered species; or relating to the trade in
covered animal parts or products that constitutes a big game violation shall be
fined not more than $1,000.00 $2,000.00 nor less than $400.00 $500.00 or

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 19 of 31
imprisoned for not more than 60 days, or both. Upon a second and all
subsequent convictions or any conviction while under license suspension
related to the requirements of part 4 of this title, the violator shall be fined not
more than $4,000.00 $5,000.00 nor less than $2,000.00 or imprisoned for not
more than 60 180 days, or both.
(b) As used in this section, “big game violation” means:
(1) violations relating to taking, possessing, transporting, buying, or
selling of big game;
(2) violations of chapter 123 of this title and the rules related to
threatened and endangered species;
(3) violation of section 4280 of this title relating to criminal
suspensions;
(4) violations of chapter 124 of this title relating to the trade in covered
animal parts or products;
(5) interference with hunting, fishing, or trapping in violation of section
4708 of this title; or
(6) illegal commercial importation or possession of wild animals in
violation of section 4709 of this title.
Sec. 4. 10 V.S.A. § 4552 is amended to read:
§ 4552. JURISDICTION; VENUE

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 20 of 31
The Vermont Criminal Division of the Superior Court shall have exclusive
jurisdiction over fish and wildlife violations with the exception of violations
related to section 4572 and chapters 123 and 124 of this title. Venue for
adjudicating fish and wildlife violations shall be the unit of the Criminal
Division of the Superior Court having jurisdiction over the geographical area
where the offense is stated to have occurred.
Sec. 5. 10 V.S.A. § 4572 is amended to read:
§ 4572. DEFINITIONS
(a) As used in this subchapter, a minor fish and wildlife violation means:
(1) a violation of 10 V.S.A. § 4145 (violation of access and landing area
rules);
(2) a violation of 10 V.S.A. § 4251 (taking wild animals and fish without
a license);
(3) a violation of 10 V.S.A. § 4266 (failure to carry a license on person
or failure to exhibit license);
(4) a violation of 10 V.S.A. § 4267 (false statements in license
application; altering license; transferring license to another person; using
another person’s license; or guiding an unlicensed person);
(5) a violation of 10 V.S.A. § 4713 (tree or ground stands or blinds); or
(6) [Repealed.]

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 21 of 31
(7) a violation of a biological collection rule adopted by the Board
under part 4 of this title; or
(8) except for big game offenses and under revocation offenses, any fish
and wildlife violation as defined by 10 V.S.A § 4551 and not otherwise listed in
this section shall be charged as a minor violation, provided that:
(A) the offender has no prior history of fish and wildlife violations;
(B) no evidence was seized in relation to the violation;
(C) a criminal warrant was not used in relation to the
violation; and
(D) there is no possibility of forfeiture.
(b) “Bureau” means the Judicial Bureau as created in 4 V.S.A. § 1102.
Sec. 6. 10 V.S.A. § 4085 is added to read:
§ 4085. REPTILES AND AMPHIBIANS; TAKING; POSSESSION
(a) A person shall not intentionally take a reptile or amphibian in the State
unless authorized by rules adopted under subsection (b) of this section.
(b) The Commissioner may establish requirements for the following by
rule:
(1) the collection or possession for commercial use, export, or sale of
reptiles and amphibians specified by the Commissioner;
(2) the taking of reptiles or amphibians that have been classified as
common, widespread, and abundant, known as S5 ranked species, with stable

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 22 of 31
or increasing populations indicated by data collected or compiled by the
Department of Fish and Wildlife;
(3) the taking of a reptile or amphibian that due to population, risk to
other native species, or risk to ecosystems has been identified as requiring a
reduction in population; or
(4) under specified criteria, the taking, collection, or possession of a
specified reptile or amphibian for scientific, educational, or noncommercial
cultural or ceremonial purposes.
(c) Rules adopted by the Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife under this
section shall be designed to maintain the best health, population, and
utilization levels of the regulated reptile or amphibian.
Sec. 7. IMPORT, POSSESSION, AND SALE OF REPTILES AND
AMPHIBIANS; ENDORSEMENTS
(a)(1) A person shall not import, possess, or sell in the State a pond slider
turtle (Trachemys scripta), unless the turtle was legally acquired as a pet prior
to July 1, 2025.
(2) A person is prohibited from releasing to the wild a pond slider
retained as a pet under this subsection. A violation of the prohibition under
this section shall be subject to enforcement as a fish and wildlife violation
under Title 10 part 4.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 23 of 31
(b) Subsection (a) of this section shall be repealed on the effective date of a
rule adopted by the Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife under 10 V.S.A. § 4085
regulating the import, possession, or sale of the pond slider turtle (Trachemys
scripta).
(c) When the Commissioner of Fish and Wildlife under 10 V.S.A. § 4085(b)
authorizes the taking of a reptile or amphibian by hunting, a hunting license
issued under 10 V.S.A. part 4 that authorizes the taking of reptiles and
amphibians under the license shall include an endorsement indicating the
authorized taking.
Sec. 8. 10 V.S.A. § 4709 is amended to read:
§ 4709. TRANSPORT, IMPORTATION, POSSESSION, AND STOCKING
OF WILD ANIMALS; POSSESSION OF WILD BOAR OR FERAL
SWINE
(a) A person shall not bring into, transport into, transport within, transport
through, or possess in the State any live wild bird or animal of any kind,
including reptiles, amphibians, or any manner of feral swine, without
authorization from the Commissioner or his or her the Commissioner’s
designee. The importation permit may be granted under such regulations
therefor as rules, requirements, or conditions that the Commissioner shall
prescribe and only after the Commissioner has made such investigation and
inspection of the birds or animals as she or he the Commissioner may deem

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 24 of 31
necessary. The Department may dispose of unlawfully possessed or imported
wildlife as it may judge best, and the State may collect treble damages from the
violator of this subsection for all expenses incurred.
(b) No person shall bring into the State from another country, state, or
province wildlife illegally taken, transported, or possessed contrary to the laws
governing the country, state, or province from which the wildlife originated.
(c) No person shall place a Vermont-issued tag on wildlife taken outside
the State. No person shall report big game in Vermont when the wildlife is
taken outside the State.
(d) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the Commissioner or duly
authorized agents of the Department of Fish and Wildlife from bringing into
the State for the purpose of planting, introducing, or stocking or from planting,
introducing, or stocking in the State any wild bird or animal.
(e) A person shall not take, collect, possess, sell, import, or export any wild
bird or animal, or parts thereof, dead or alive, for commercial purposes unless
authorized by statute, the rules of the Board, rules of the Commissioner, or a
permit from the Commissioner.
(f) Any person who violates this section may be subject to the penalties set
forth in section 4518 of this title and also may be required to pay additional
penalties based on reasonable mitigation and potential economic benefit
associated with commercial trade.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 25 of 31
(g) The Commissioner may bring an action in the unit of the Criminal
Division of the Superior Court having jurisdiction over the geographical area
where the offense is stated to have occurred, or the Environmental Division of
the Superior Court, to compel reasonable mitigation and recover economic
benefits for commercial collection and trade violations under this subsection.
(h) Applicants shall pay a permit fee of $100.00.
(f)(i)(1) The Commissioner shall not issue a permit under this section for
the importation or possession of the following live species, a hybrid or genetic
variant of the following species, offspring of the following species, or offspring
or a hybrid of a genetically engineered variant of the following species: feral
swine, including wild boar, wild hog, wild swine, feral pig, feral hog, old world
swine, razorback, Eurasian wild boar, or Russian wild boar (Sus scrofo
Linnaeus). A feral swine is:
* * *
Sec. 9. 10 V.S.A. § 5403(a) is amended to read:
(a) Except as authorized under this chapter, a person shall not:
(1) take, possess, or transport wildlife or wild plants that are members
of a threatened or endangered species; or
(2) destroy or adversely impact critical habitat;
(3) sell or offer for sale in intrastate commerce a threatened or
endangered species;

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 26 of 31
(4) deliver, receive, carry, transport, or ship a threatened or endangered
species in intrastate commerce; or
(5) import a threatened or endangered species into or export a
threatened or endangered species from Vermont.
Sec. 10. 10 V.S.A. § 5408 is amended to read:
§ 5408. AUTHORIZED TAKINGS; INCIDENTAL TAKINGS;
DESTRUCTION OF CRITICAL HABITAT
(a) Authorized taking. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, after
obtaining the advice of the Endangered Species Committee, the Secretary may
permit, under such terms and conditions as the Secretary may require as
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, the taking of a threatened
or endangered species, the destruction of or adverse impact on critical habitat,
or any act otherwise prohibited by this chapter if done for any of the following
purposes:
(1) scientific purposes;
(2) to enhance the propagation or survival of a threatened or
endangered species;
(3) zoological exhibition;
(4) educational purposes;
(5) noncommercial cultural or ceremonial purposes; or

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 27 of 31
(6) special purposes consistent with the purposes of the federal
Endangered Species Act.
(b) Incidental taking. After obtaining the advice of the Endangered Species
Committee, the Secretary may permit, under such terms and conditions as
necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, the incidental taking of a
threatened or endangered species or the destruction of or adverse impact on
critical habitat if:
(1) the taking is necessary to conduct an otherwise lawful activity;
(2) the taking is attendant or secondary to, and not the purpose of, the
lawful activity;
(3) the impact of the permitted incidental take is minimized; and
(4) the incidental taking will not impair the conservation or recovery of
any endangered species or threatened species.
* * *
(k) Public notice. Prior Except for threatened and endangered species
listed by the Secretary in accordance with subsection 5410(b) of this title, prior
to issuing a permit for an incidental taking and prior to the initial issuance or
amendment of a general permit under this section, the Secretary shall provide
for public notice of no not fewer than 30 days, opportunity for written
comment, and opportunity to request a public informational hearing. The
Except for threatened and endangered species listed by the Secretary in

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 28 of 31
accordance with subsection 5410(b) of this title, the Secretary shall post permit
applications, permit decisions, and the initial or amended general permits on
the website of the Agency of Natural Resources. The Except for threatened and
endangered species listed by the Secretary in accordance with subsection
5410(b) of this title, the Secretary also shall provide notice to interested
persons who request notice of permit applications, permit decisions, and
proposed general permits or proposed amendments to general permits.
(l) General permits.
(1) The Secretary may issue general permits for activities that will not
affect the continued survival or recovery of a threatened or endangered
species.
* * *
(6) Prior Except for threatened and endangered species listed by the
Secretary in accordance with subsection 5410(b) of this title, prior to issuing
an initial or amended general permit under this subsection, the Secretary
shall:
(A) post a draft of the general permit on the Agency website;
(B) provide public notice of at least 30 days; and
(C) provide for written comments or a public hearing, or both.
(7) For applications for coverage under the terms of an issued general
permit, the applicant shall provide notice on a form provided by the Secretary.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 29 of 31
The Except for threatened and endangered species listed by the Secretary in
accordance with subsection 5410(b) of this title, the Secretary shall post notice
of the application on the Agency website and shall provide an opportunity for
written comment, regarding whether the application complies with the terms
and conditions of the general permit, for ten 10 days following receipt of the
application.
* * *
Sec. 11. 10 V.S.A. § 5410 is amended to read:
§ 5410. LOCATION CONFIDENTIAL
(a) The Secretary shall not disclose information regarding the specific
location of threatened or endangered species sites or habitats except that the
Secretary shall disclose information regarding the location of the threatened or
endangered species to:
(1) to the owner of land upon which the species is located;
(2) to a potential buyer of land upon which the species is located who
has a bona fide contract to buy the land and applies to the Secretary for
disclosure of threatened or endangered species information; or
(3) to qualified individuals or organizations, public agencies, and
nonprofit organizations for scientific research or for preservation and planning
purposes when the Secretary determines that the preservation of the species is
not further endangered by the disclosure; or

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 30 of 31
(4) during regulatory processes with the exception of threatened or
endangered species listed under subsection (b) of this section.
(b) The Secretary shall maintain a subset list of threatened and endangered
species whose specific names shall not be included in regulatory planning.
The subset list shall include threatened or endangered species for which the
species names and locations shall not be disclosed because of the risk that the
species will be significantly harmed by unauthorized take, such as illegal
collection, commercial trade, human-caused mortality, or destruction of
habitat. The list shall be based on the rarity of the species, known collection
and commercial trade activities in Vermont and other states or countries,
incidents of human-caused mortality or destruction of habitat, and other
factors that present a threat to the continued existence of the species.
(c) When the Secretary issues a permit under this chapter to take a
threatened or endangered species or destroy or adversely impact critical
habitat and when the Secretary designates critical habitat by rule under
section 5402a of this title, the Secretary shall disclose only the municipality
and general location where the threatened or endangered species or
designated critical habitat is located. When the Secretary designates critical
habitat under section 5402a of this title, the Secretary shall notify the
municipality in which the critical habitat is located and shall disclose the
general location of the designated critical habitat.

BILLAS PASSED BY THE HOUSE H.230
2025 Page 31 of 31
Sec. 12. 10 V.S.A. § 4829 is amended to read:
§ 4829. PERSON SUFFERING DAMAGE BY DEER OR BLACK BEAR
(a) A person engaged in the business of farming who suffers damage by
deer to the person’s crops, fruit trees, or crop-bearing plants on land not
posted against the hunting of deer, or a person engaged in the business of
farming who suffers damage by black bear to the person’s cattle, sheep, swine,
poultry, or bees or bee hives on land not posted against hunting or trapping of
black bear is entitled to reimbursement for the damage up to an amount not to
exceed $5,000.00 per year, and may apply to the Department of Fish and
Wildlife within 72 hours of the occurrence of the damage for reimbursement
for the damage. As used in this section, “post” means any signage that would
lead a reasonable person to believe that hunting is prohibited on the land.
(b) As used in this section, a person is “engaged in the business of
farming” if he or she earns at least one-half of the farmer’s annual gross
income from the business of farming, as that term is defined in the Internal
Revenue Code, 26 C.F.R. § 1.175-3. [Repealed.]
Sec. 13. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025, except that in Sec. 6, 10 V.S.A.
§ 4085(a) (related to the taking of reptiles and amphibians) shall take effect on
January 1, 2027.